Washington statutes.
RCW 21.20.915

Saving—Prior effective registrations.

All effective registrations under prior law and all conditions imposed upon such registrations remain in effect so long as they would have remained in effect if they had become effective under this chapter. They are considered to have been filed, entered, or imposed under this chapter. All dealers who are duly registered as brokers and all salespersons and issuers' agents who are duly registered as agents under said securities act, mining act or oil and mining leases act, on the *effective date of this chapter shall be deemed to be duly registered under and subject to the provisions of this chapter, such registration to expire on the 30th day of June of the year in which this chapter becomes effective and to be subject to renewal as provided in this chapter.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 68 s 44; 1959 c 282 s 64.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The "effective date of this chapter" is midnight June 10, 1959, see preface 1959 session laws.